Alaska statutes. Title 26. Military Affairs, Veterans, Disasters, and Aerospace.
Article 3. Fuel Emergency.

Sec. 26.23.400.
Fuel emergency fund.

There is established in the Office of the Governor the fuel emergency fund.
When the governor determines that a shortage of fuel is sufficiently severe to justify state assistance, the governor may make a grant from the fuel emergency fund to a political subdivision to purchase emergency supplies of fuel.

History.

(§ 17 ch 178 SLA 1990)